Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-954.02
Superintendent; continuing education.

Beginning January 1, 1988, each county weed control superintendent shall be required to complete twenty hours of annual continuing education. The cost of continuing education shall be included in the annual budget of the weed control authority. Such continuing education shall focus on the use of equipment, drift control, calibration, proper selection of pesticides, legal responsibilities, and duties of office. Any statewide association of county weed control superintendents or of local governments responsible for weed control may sponsor the required continuing education program. All continuing education programs shall be submitted to the director for review and approval. The sponsoring organization shall maintain records of attendance and notify each county board of the hours completed by its weed control superintendent by January 1 of each year. Failure to complete the required number of hours of continuing education shall subject such weed control superintendent to removal from office by the county board.

Laws 1987, LB 138, § 5.